src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJ_VIIPALOITU
!!  The gradation of t ~ d after u is in class `@LEXNAME@`, the
!!  dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.
!!  The commonest t ~ d variation in u stems comes from nut participle’s
!!  passive’s back form (-tu).
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~d u
!!€  viipaloitu: viipaloitu+A+Sg+Nom # sliced
!!€  viipaloidussa: viipaloitu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  viipaloituihin: viipaloitu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  viipaloiduista: viipaloitu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  viipaloidumpi: viipaloitu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  viipaloiduin: viipaloitu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:du  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:du  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:du  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:du  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_YKSILÖITY
!!  The gradation of t ~ d after u is in class `@LEXNAME@`, the
!!  dictionary class for this is ¹⁻F.
!!  The commonest t ~ d variation in u stems comes from nut participle’s
!!  passive’s front form (-ty).
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~d y
!!€  yksilöity: yksilöity+A+Sg+Nom # singled
!!€  yksilöidyssä: yksilöity+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  yksilöityihin: yksilöity+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  yksilöidyistä: yksilöity+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  yksilöidympi: yksilöity+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  yksilöidyin: yksilöity+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:dy  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:dy  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:dy  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:dy  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  And there's none with t and ö

LEXICON ADJ_LENKO
!!  The adjectives with -nko stem belong to class `@LEXNAME@`, and the
!!  dictionary class was ¹⁻G.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 k~g o
!!€  lenko: lenko+A+Sg+Nom # crooked
!!€  lengossa: lenko+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  lengoista: lenko+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  lenkoihin: lenko+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  lengompi: lenko+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  lengoin: lenko+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:go  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:go  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:ko  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:ko  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ko  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:go  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:go  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


!!  There's no adjectives ending in nku
!!  nor with y and nk
!!  And ö with nk
!!  There are no gradating p's after m's in unchanging stems
!!  For all these, check the noun patterns.
!
LEXICON ADJ_MELTO
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~l o
!!€  melto: melto+A+Sg+Nom # ?????
!!€  mellossa: melto+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  meltoihin: melto+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  melloista: melto+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  mellompi: melto+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  melloin: melto+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:lo  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:lo  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:lo  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:lo  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_PARANNELTU
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!  The common u stem after l is in nut participles passive (-tu):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~l u
!!€  paranneltu: paranneltu+A+Sg+Nom # embettered
!!€  parannellussa: paranneltu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  paranneltuihin: paranneltu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  parannelluista: paranneltu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  parannellumpi: paranneltu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  parannelluin: paranneltu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:lu  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:lu  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:lu  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:lu  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;


LEXICON ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after l in o stems is in class 
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!  As with y and t:
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~l y
!!€  vähätelty: vähätelty+A+Sg+Nom # belittled
!!€  vähätellyssä: vähätelty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  vähäteltyihin: vähätelty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  vähätellyistä: vähätelty+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  vähätellympi: vähätelty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  vähätellyin: vähätelty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ly  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ly  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ly  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ly  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There's no adjective ending -ltö in our lexical database.

LEXICON ADJ_VENTO
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after n in o stems is in class 
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻J.
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~n o
!!€  vento: vento+A+Sg+Nom # ?
!!€  vennossa: vento+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  ventoihin: vento+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  vennoista: vento+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  vennompi: vento+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  vennoin: vento+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:to  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:no  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:no  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:to  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:no  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:no  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_PANTU
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after n in u stems is in class 
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!  The common u stem after n is in nut participle’s passive’s back form (-tu):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~n u
!!€  pantu: pantu+A+Sg+Nom # brewed
!!€  pannussa: pantu+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  pantuihin: pantu+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  pannuista: pantu+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  pannumpi: pantu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  pannuin: pantu+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:nu  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:nu  ADJ_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_A_AN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_UN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:tu  ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:nu  ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:nu  ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE  ;

LEXICON ADJ_MENTY
!!  The quantitative gradation of t after n in y stems is in class 
!!  `@LEXNAME@`, which corresponds to dictionary class ¹⁻I.
!!  The common u stem after n is in nut participle’s passive’s front form
!!  (-ty):
!!€gt-norm:  Adjective gradations 1 t~n y
!!€  menty: menty+A+Sg+Nom # belittled
!!€  mennyssä: menty+A+Sg+Ine
!!€  mentyihin: menty+A+Pl+Ill
!!€  mennyistä: menty+A+Pl+Ela
!!€  mennympi: menty+A+Comp+Sg+Nom
!!€  mennyin: menty+A+Superl+Sg+Nom
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_NOMINATIVE  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS  ;
0:ny  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS  ;
0:ny  ADJ_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä_ÄN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_YN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_PARTITIVE_JÄ  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_GENITIVE_JEN  ;
0:ty  ADJ_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN  ;
0:ny  ADJ_FRONT_COMPARATIVE  ;
0:ny  ADJ_FRONT_SUPERLATIVE  ;

!!  There are no adjectives ending in -ntö
