src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON ADJECTIVE
aktivoitu+A:aktivoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
apinoitu+A:apinoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
arveltu+A:arvel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
aseteltu+A:asetel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
demytologisoitu+A:demytologisoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
dimeroitu+A:dimeroi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
ei-eroteltu+A:ei-erotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
eieroteltu+A:ei#erotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
eritelty+A:eritel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
esikäsitelty+A:esikäsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
fermentoitu+A:fermentoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
geenimuunneltu+A:geenimuunnel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
haaveiltu+A:haaveil  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
hahmoteltu+A:hahmotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
halogenoitu+A:halogenoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
hemmoteltu+A:hemmotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
hento+A:hen  ADJ_VENTO  ;
hintasäännöstelty+A:hintasäännöstel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
hintasäännöstelty+A:hinta#säännöstel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
huoliteltu+A:huolitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
hutiloitu+A:hutiloi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
hyytelöity+A:hyytelöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
hätiköity+A:hätiköi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
identifioitu+A:identifioi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
ihailtu+A:ihail  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
ikävöity+A:ikävöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
immunosuppressoitu+A:immunosuppressoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
jaoteltu+A:jaotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
jumaloitu+A:jumaloi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
jäljitelty+A:jäljitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
kalibroitu+A:kalibroi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
katenoitu+A:katenoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
kaunisteltu+A:kaunistel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
konfiguroitu+A:konfiguroi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
koteloitu+A:koteloi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
kuultu+A:kuul  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
käsinommeltu+A:käsinommel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
käsitelty+A:käsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
laiminlyöty+A:laiminlyö  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
laskelmoitu+A:laskelmoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
leikelty+A:leikel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
lenko+A:len  ADJ_LENKO  ;
liioiteltu+A:liioitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
loppuunmyyty+A:loppuunmyy  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
luonnosteltu+A:luonnostel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
lyöty+A:lyö  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
lämpökäsitelty+A:lämpökäsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
magnetisoitu+A:magnetisoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
melto+A:mel  ADJ_MELTO  ;
menty+A:men  ADJ_MENTY  ;
mikrosoitu+A:mikrosoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
mitätöity+A:mitätöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
muotoiltu+A:muotoil  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
myyty+A:myy  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
määritelty+A:määritel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
neliöity+A:neliöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
neutralisoitu+A:neutralisoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
neuvoteltu+A:neuvotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
näytelty+A:näytel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
pahoinpidelty+A:pahoinpidel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
paloiteltu+A:paloitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
pantu+A:pan  ADJ_PANTU  ;
parfymoitu+A:parfymoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
peitelty+A:peitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
peloteltu+A:pelotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
personoitu+A:personoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
pintakäsitelty+A:pintakäsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
puolikäsitelty+A:puolikäsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
puolikäsitelty+A:puoli#käsitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
puolusteltu+A:puolustel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
pysäköity+A:pysäköi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
rasioitu+A:rasioi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
rekisteröity+A:rekisteröi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
rento+A:ren  ADJ_VENTO  ;
ripoteltu+A:ripotel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
ryhmitelty+A:ryhmitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
saippuoitu+A:saippuoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
seppelöity+A:seppelöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
sinetöity+A:sinetöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
sofistikoitu+A:sofistikoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
soviteltu+A:sovitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
sublimoitu+A:sublimoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
suunniteltu+A:suunnitel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
säädelty+A:säädel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
säännöstelty+A:säännöstel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
tasopolarisoitu+A:tasopolarisoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
teeskennelty+A:teeskennel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
turmeltu+A:turmel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
tyylitelty+A:tyylitel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
tärvelty+A:tärvel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
uudelleenjärjestelty+A:uudelleenjärjestel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
vento+A:ven  ADJ_VENTO  ;
viimeistelty+A:viimeistel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
viljelty+A:viljel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
viraltapantu+A:viraltapan  ADJ_PANTU  ;
voideltu+A:voidel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
vulkanoitu+A:vulkanoi  ADJ_VIIPALOITU  ;
vähätelty+A:vähätel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
väärinkohdeltu+A:väärin#kohdel  ADJ_PARANNELTU  ;
vääristelty+A:vääristel  ADJ_VÄHÄTELTY  ;
yksilöity+A:yksilöi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
ympäröity+A:ympäröi  ADJ_YKSILÖITY  ;
